Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.60.110

Ballot containers, sealing, opening.

(1) Immediately after their tabulation, all ballots counted at a ballot counting center must be sealed in containers that identify the primary or election and be retained for at least sixty days or according to federal law, whichever is longer.

(2) In the presence of major party observers who are available, ballots may be removed from the sealed containers at the elections department and consolidated into one sealed container for storage purposes. The containers may only be opened by the canvassing board as part of the canvass, to conduct recounts, to conduct a random check under RCW 29A.60.170, to conduct an audit under RCW 29A.60.185, or by order of the superior court in a contest or election dispute. If the canvassing board opens a ballot container, it shall make a full record of the additional tabulation or examination made of the ballots. This record must be added to any other record of the canvassing process in that county.

[ 2018 c 218 s 4; 2013 c 11 s 61; 2011 c 10 s 50; 2003 c 111 s 1511; 1999 c 158 s 14; 1990 c 59 s 59. Formerly RCW 29.54.075.]

NOTES:

Intent—2018 c 218: See note following RCW 29A.60.185.

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Intent—Effective date—1990 c 59: See notes following RCW 29A.04.013.